Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-2503
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Occupational Therapy Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-2504 to 38-2514.01 apply.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 31;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 451;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 757;

Laws 2001, LB 346, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 95;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 121;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-6103;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 651;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 843;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 4.